Mississippi, session 2026, HB4078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  The Board of Supervisors of Prentiss County, Mississippi, in its discretion, is authorized, by resolution duly adopted, to levy an assessment, in addition to any other assessments and court costs, on convictions obtained in the Justice Court, County Court and Circuit Court of Prentiss County, as follows: (a)  An amount not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) on each conviction obtained in the Justice Court, County Court and Circuit Court of Prentiss County, except for convictions for driving under the influence; and (b)  An amount not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) on each conviction obtained for driving under the influence of alcohol or any other substance which has impaired the person's ability to operate a motor vehicle, pursuant to Section 63-11-30, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2)  The avails of the additional assessment imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be expended by the Board of Supervisors of Prentiss County to fund repairs, maintenance and renovations of the historic Prentiss County Courthouse, which is  designated as a Mississippi Landmark. (3)  This section shall be repealed from and after July 1, 2030. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.